Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.470

Residence district.

"Residence district" means the territory contiguous to and including a public highway not comprising a business district, when the property on such public highway for a continuous distance of three hundred feet or more on either side thereof is in the main improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.470. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 51; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part; 1929 c 180 s 1, part; 1927 c 309 s 2, part; RRS s 6362-2, part.]